Nevada, session 83, SB167.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 598 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
manufacturer shall not import for profit, sell or offer for sale in
this State any household cleaning product for which the
manufacturer knew or reasonably should have known that animal
testing was conducted or contracted by or on behalf of the
manufacturer or any supplier of the manufacturer if the animal
testing was conducted on or after January 1, 2030.
2. The prohibition in subsection 1 does not apply to animal
testing, or data derived therefrom, that is conducted:
(a) To comply with a federal or state law, including, without
limitation, requirements of the Toxic Substances Control Act, 15
U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq. or guidelines issued pursuant to that Act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) Because no appropriate non-animal testing methods exist
or the existing non-animal testing methods cannot be reasonably
conducted.
(c) To enable a comprehensive safety assessment for which
animal testing is necessary even after the integration and
evaluation of all relevant existing data, including, without
limitation, data from animal and non-animal testing.
(d) To comply with a requirement, notification or registration
of a regulatory agency of a foreign jurisdiction.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) A household cleaning product or ingredient in a household
cleaning product if animal testing was conducted for the
household cleaning product or ingredient before January 1, 2030,
even if the household cleaning product in its final form or
ingredient was manufactured on or after that date.
(b) Data from animal testing of an ingredient that is a
commodity produced in large quantities and is used as a raw
material for end uses outside of cleaning products, so long as the
animal testing on the ingredient was not conducted predominately
for the purpose of assessing the use of the ingredient in a
household cleaning product.
(c) An ingredient a manufacturer obtained from a supplier for
which:
(1) The manufacturer requested verification from the
supplier that the ingredient has not been subject to animal testing;
and
(2) The supplier is unable to provide such verification due
to a lack of access to the necessary data.
4. This section shall not be construed to prevent a
manufacturer or supplier from reviewing, assessing or retaining
existing data from animal testing, including, without limitation,
data sourced from a consortia or nonprofit organization.
5. A violation of this section constitutes a deceptive trade
practice for the purposes of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Animal testing” means any process or procedure that uses
a live, nonhuman vertebrate or cephalopod to obtain information
on the characteristics of a household cleaning product or any
ingredient thereof and which generates information regarding the
ability of a household cleaning product or ingredient to produce a
specific biological effect under specified conditions.
(b) “Household cleaning product” means any product
manufactured from chemicals that is designed to clean or provide
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
protection to household surfaces or furniture, including, without
limitation, task-specific cleaning products, such as spot removers,
stain removers, upholstery cleaners, glass cleaners, dish soap and
laundry detergent. The term does not include any products subject
to regulation under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and
Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §§ 136 et seq.
(c) “Ingredient” means any single chemical entity or mixture
that is intentionally used as a component in the manufacture of a
household cleaning product. The term does not include any
component subject to regulation under the Federal Insecticide,
Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §§ 136 et seq.
(d) “Manufacturer” means a person who imports, produces or
manufactures a household cleaning product and whose name
appears on the label of the household cleaning product.
(e) “Non-animal testing” means any process or procedure that
does not use a live, nonhuman vertebrate or cephalopod to obtain
information on the characteristics of a household cleaning
product or any ingredient thereof and which generates
information regarding the ability of a household cleaning product
or ingredient to produce a specific biological effect under specified
conditions.
(f) “Supplier” means any entity that directly provides an
ingredient to a manufacturer for the formulation of a household
cleaning product.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2030.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)